Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Creation, Alteration, and Termination of Common Interest Communities
38-33.3-211.
Alterations of units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, a unit owner:

May make any improvements or alterations to his unit that do not impair the structural integrity, electrical systems, or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the common interest community;

May not change the appearance of the common elements without permission of the association; or

After acquiring an adjoining unit or an adjoining part of an adjoining unit, may remove or alter any intervening partition or create apertures therein, even if the partition in whole or in part is a common element, if those acts do not impair the structural integrity, electrical systems, or mechanical systems or lessen the support of any portion of the common interest community. Removal of partitions or creation of apertures under this paragraph (c) is not an alteration of boundaries.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1724, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-212.
Relocation of boundaries between adjoining units.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, and pursuant to the procedures described in section 38-33.3-217, the boundaries between adjoining units may be relocated by an amendment to the declaration upon application to the association by the owners of those units.

In order to relocate the boundaries between adjoining units, the owners of those units, as the applicant, must submit an application to the executive board, which application shall be executed by those owners and shall include:

Evidence sufficient to the executive board that the applicant has complied with all local rules and ordinances and that the proposed relocation of boundaries does not violate the terms of any document evidencing a security interest;

The proposed reallocation of interests, if any;

The proposed form for amendments to the declaration, including the plats or maps, as may be necessary to show the altered boundaries between adjoining units, and their dimensions and identifying numbers;

A deposit against attorney fees and costs which the association will incur in reviewing and effectuating the application, in an amount reasonably estimated by the executive board; and

Such other information as may be reasonably requested by the executive board.

No relocation of boundaries between adjoining units shall be effected without the necessary amendments to the declaration, plats, or maps, executed and recorded pursuant to section 38-33.3-217 (3) and (5).

All costs and attorney fees incurred by the association as a result of an application shall be the sole obligation of the applicant.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1725, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-213.
Subdivision of units.

If the declaration expressly so permits, a unit may be subdivided into two or more units. Subject to the provisions of the declaration and other provisions of law, and pursuant to the procedures described in this section, a unit owner may apply to the association to subdivide a unit.

In order to subdivide a unit, the unit owner of such unit, as the applicant, must submit an application to the executive board, which application shall be executed by such owner and shall include:

Evidence that the applicant of the proposed subdivision shall have complied with all building codes, fire codes, zoning codes, planned unit development requirements, master plans, and other applicable ordinances or resolutions adopted and enforced by the local governing body and that the proposed subdivision does not violate the terms of any document evidencing a security interest encumbering the unit;

The proposed reallocation of interests, if any;

The proposed form for amendments to the declaration, including the plats or maps, as may be necessary to show the units which are created by the subdivision and their dimensions, and identifying numbers;

A deposit against attorney fees and costs which the association will incur in reviewing and effectuating the application, in an amount reasonably estimated by the executive board; and

Such other information as may be reasonably requested by the executive board.

No subdivision of units shall be effected without the necessary amendments to the declaration, plats, or maps, executed and recorded pursuant to section 38-33.3-217 (3) and (5).

All costs and attorney fees incurred by the association as a result of an application shall be the sole obligation of the applicant.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1726, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 481, § 8, effective July 1.

38-33.3-214.
Easement for encroachments.

To the extent that any unit or common element encroaches on any other unit or common element, a valid easement for the encroachment exists. The easement does not relieve a unit owner of liability in case of willful misconduct nor relieve a declarant or any other person of liability for failure to adhere to the plats and maps.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1727, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-215.
Use for sales purposes.

A declarant may maintain sales offices, management offices, and models in the common interest community only if the declaration so provides. Except as provided in a declaration, any real estate in a common interest community used as a sales office, management office, or model and not designated a unit by the declaration is a common element. If a declarant ceases to be a unit owner, such declarant ceases to have any rights with regard to any real estate used as a sales office, management office, or model, unless it is removed promptly from the common interest community in accordance with a right to remove reserved in the declaration. Subject to any limitations in the declaration, a declarant may maintain signs on the common elements advertising the common interest community. This section is subject to the provisions of other state laws and to local ordinances.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1727, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 481, § 9, effective July 1.

38-33.3-216.
Easement rights.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, a declarant has an easement through the common elements as may be reasonably necessary for the purpose of discharging a declarant’s obligations or exercising special declarant rights, whether arising under this article or reserved in the declaration.

In a planned community, subject to the provisions of the declaration and the ability of the association to regulate and convey or encumber the common elements as set forth in sections 38-33.3-302 (1)(f) and 38-33.3-312, the unit owners have an easement:

In the common elements for the purpose of access to their units; and

To use the common elements and all other real estate that must become common elements for all other purposes.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1727, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-217.
Amendment of declaration.

shall be construed to prohibit the association from seeking a court order, in accordance with subsection (7) of this section, to reduce the required percentage to less than sixty-seven percent.

(II)

If the declaration provides for an initial period of applicability to be followed by automatic extension periods, the declaration may be amended at any time in accordance with subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a).

(III)

This paragraph (a) shall not apply:

To the extent that its application is limited by subsection (4) of this section;

To amendments executed by a declarant under section 38-33.3-205 (4) and (5), 38-33.3-208 (3), 38-33.3-209 (6), 38-33.3-210, or 38-33.3-222;

To amendments executed by an association under section 38-33.3-107, 38-33.3-206 (4), 38-33.3-208 (2), 38-33.3-212, 38-33.3-213, or 38-33.3-218 (11) and (12);

To amendments executed by the district court for any county that includes all or any portion of a common interest community under subsection (7) of this section; or

To amendments that affect phased communities or declarant-controlled communities.

If the declaration requires first mortgagees to approve or consent to amendments, but does not set forth a procedure for registration or notification of first mortgagees, the association may:

A first mortgagee that does not deliver to the association a negative response within sixty days after the date of the notice specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) shall be deemed to have approved the proposed amendment.

The notification procedure set forth in this paragraph (b) is not mandatory. If the consent of first mortgagees is obtained without resort to this paragraph (b), and otherwise in accordance with the declaration, the notice to first mortgagees shall be considered sufficient.

(A)

Send a dated, written notice and a copy of any proposed amendment by certified mail to each first mortgagee at its most recent address as shown on the recorded deed of trust or recorded assignment thereof; and

(B)

Cause the dated notice, together with information on how to obtain a copy of the proposed amendment, to be printed in full at least twice, on separate occasions at least one week apart, in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the common interest community is located.

No action to challenge the validity of an amendment adopted by the association pursuant to this section may be brought more than one year after the amendment is recorded.

Every amendment to the declaration must be recorded in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located and is effective only upon recordation. An amendment must be indexed in the grantee’s index in the name of the common interest community and the association and in the grantor’s index in the name of each person executing the amendment.

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of this article, no amendment may create or increase special declarant rights, increase the number of units, or change the boundaries of any unit or the allocated interests of a unit in the absence of a vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association, including sixty-seven percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, are allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

The sixty-seven-percent maximum percentage stated in paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any common interest community in which one unit owner, by virtue of the declaration, bylaws, or other governing documents of the association, is allocated sixty-seven percent or more of the votes in the association.

(4.5)

Except to the extent expressly permitted or required by other provisions of this article, no amendment may change the uses to which any unit is restricted in the absence of a vote or agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential use.

Amendments to the declaration required by this article to be recorded by the association shall be prepared, executed, recorded, and certified on behalf of the association by any officer of the association designated for that purpose or, in the absence of designation, by the president of the association.

All expenses associated with preparing and recording an amendment to the declaration shall be the sole responsibility of:

In the case of an amendment pursuant to sections 38-33.3-208 (2), 38-33.3-212, and 38-33.3-213, the unit owners desiring the amendment; and

In the case of an amendment pursuant to section 38-33.3-208 (3), 38-33.3-209 (6), or 38-33.3-210, the declarant; and

In all other cases, the association.

The association, acting through its executive board pursuant to section 38-33.3-303 (1), may petition the district court for any county that includes all or any portion of the common interest community for an order amending the declaration of the common interest community if:

The association has twice sent notice of the proposed amendment to all unit owners that are entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment or are required for approval of the proposed amendment by any means allowed pursuant to the provisions regarding notice to members in sections 7-121-402 and 7-127-104, C.R.S., of the “Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act”, articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S.;

The association has discussed the proposed amendment during at least one meeting of the association; and

Unit owners of units to which are allocated more than fifty percent of the number of consents, approvals, or votes of the association that would be required to adopt the proposed amendment pursuant to the declaration have voted in favor of the proposed amendment.

A petition filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (7) shall include:

A summary of:

The procedures and requirements for amending the declaration that are set forth in the declaration;

The proposed amendment to the declaration;

The effect of and reason for the proposed amendment, including a statement of the circumstances that make the amendment necessary or advisable;

The results of any vote taken with respect to the proposed amendment; and

Any other matters that the association believes will be useful to the court in deciding whether to grant the petition; and

As exhibits, copies of:

The declaration as originally recorded and any recorded amendments to the declaration;

The text of the proposed amendment;

Copies of any notices sent pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (7); and

Any other documents that the association believes will be useful to the court in deciding whether to grant the petition.

Within three days of the filing of the petition, the district court shall set a date for hearing the petition. Unless the court finds that an emergency requires an immediate hearing, the hearing shall be held no earlier than forty-five days and no later than sixty days after the date the association filed the petition.

No later than ten days after the date for hearing a petition is set pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (7), the association shall:

Send notice of the petition by any written means allowed pursuant to the provisions regarding notice to members in sections 7-121-402 and 7-127-104, C.R.S., of the “Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act”, articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., to any unit owner, by first-class mail, postage prepaid or by hand delivery to any declarant, and by first-class mail, postage prepaid, to any lender that holds a security interest in one or more units and is entitled by the declaration or any underwriting guidelines or requirements of that lender or of the federal national mortgage association, the federal home loan mortgage corporation, the federal housing administration, the veterans administration, or the government national mortgage corporation to vote on the proposed amendment. The notice shall include:

A copy of the petition which need not include the exhibits attached to the original petition filed with the district court;

The date the district court will hear the petition; and

A statement that the court may grant the petition and order the proposed amendment to the declaration unless any declarant entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment, the federal housing administration, the veterans administration, more than thirty-three percent of the unit owners entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment, or more than thirty-three percent of the lenders that hold a security interest in one or more units and are entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment file written objections to the proposed amendment with the court prior to the hearing;

File with the district court:

A list of the names and mailing addresses of declarants, unit owners, and lenders that hold a security interest in one or more units and that are entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment; and

A copy of the notice required by subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (d).

The district court shall grant the petition after hearing if it finds that:

The association has complied with all requirements of this subsection (7);

No more than thirty-three percent of the unit owners entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment have filed written objections to the proposed amendment with the court prior to the hearing;

Neither the federal housing administration nor the veterans administration is entitled to approve the proposed amendment, or if so entitled has not filed written objections to the proposed amendment with the court prior to the hearing;

Either the proposed amendment does not eliminate any rights or privileges designated in the declaration as belonging to a declarant or no declarant has filed written objections to the proposed amendment with the court prior to the hearing;

Either the proposed amendment does not eliminate any rights or privileges designated in the declaration as belonging to any lenders that hold security interests in one or more units and that are entitled by the declaration to vote on the proposed amendment or no more than thirty-three percent of such lenders have filed written objections to the proposed amendment with the court prior to the hearing; and

The proposed amendment would neither terminate the declaration nor change the allocated interests of the unit owners as specified in the declaration, except as allowed pursuant to section 38-33.3-315.

Upon granting a petition, the court shall enter an order approving the proposed amendment and requiring the association to record the amendment in each county that includes all or any portion of the common interest community. Once recorded, the amendment shall have the same legal effect as if it were adopted pursuant to any requirements set forth in the declaration.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1727, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 649, § 14, effective April 30.

L. 98:

(1) and (4) amended and (4.5) added, p. 482, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended and (7) added, p. 692, § 1, effective May 19; (1) amended, p. 629, § 38, effective August 4.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 1380, § 8, effective June 6.

L. 2006:

(1) and (4) amended, p. 1219, § 8, effective May 26.

Editor’s note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by Senate Bill 99-221 and House Bill 99-1360 were harmonized.

38-33.3-218.
Termination of common interest community.

Except in the case of a taking of all the units by eminent domain, or in the case of foreclosure against an entire cooperative of a security interest that has priority over the declaration, a common interest community may be terminated only by agreement of unit owners of units to which at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association are allocated or any larger percentage the declaration specifies. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units in the common interest community are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses.

(1.5)

No planned community that is required to exist pursuant to a development or site plan shall be terminated by agreement of unit owners, unless a copy of the termination agreement is sent by certified mail or hand delivered to the governing body of every municipality in which a portion of the planned community is situated or, if the planned community is situated in an unincorporated area, to the board of county commissioners for every county in which a portion of the planned community is situated.

An agreement of unit owners to terminate must be evidenced by their execution of a termination agreement or ratifications thereof in the same manner as a deed, by the requisite number of unit owners. The termination agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless it is recorded before that date. A termination agreement and all ratifications thereof must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the common interest community is situated and is effective only upon recordation.

In the case of a condominium or planned community containing only units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide that all of the common elements and units of the common interest community must be sold following termination. If, pursuant to the agreement, any real estate in the common interest community is to be sold following termination, the termination agreement must set forth the minimum terms of the sale.

In the case of a condominium or planned community containing any units not having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, a termination agreement may provide for sale of the common elements, but it may not require that the units be sold following termination, unless the declaration as originally recorded provided otherwise or all the unit owners consent to the sale.

Subject to the provisions of a termination agreement described in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract for the sale of real estate in a common interest community following termination, but the contract is not binding on the unit owners until approved pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section. If any real estate is to be sold following termination, title to that real estate, upon termination, vests in the association as trustee for the holders of all interests in the units. Thereafter, the association has all the powers necessary and appropriate to effect the sale. Until the sale has been concluded and the proceeds thereof distributed, the association continues in existence with all the powers it had before termination. Proceeds of the sale must be distributed to unit owners and lienholders as their interests may appear, in accordance with subsections (8), (9), and (10) of this section, taking into account the value of property owned or distributed that is not sold so as to preserve the proportionate interests of each unit owner with respect to all property cumulatively. Unless otherwise specified in the termination agreement, as long as the association holds title to the real estate, each unit owner and the unit owner’s successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted the unit. During the period of that occupancy, each unit owner and the unit owner’s successors in interest remain liable for all assessments and other obligations imposed on unit owners by this article or the declaration.

In a planned community, if all or a portion of the common elements are not to be sold following termination, title to the common elements not sold vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in fractional interests that maintain, after taking into account the fair market value of property owned and the proceeds of property sold, their respective interests as provided in subsection (10) of this section with respect to all property appraised under said subsection (10), and liens on the units shift accordingly.

In a common interest community, containing units having horizontal boundaries described in the declaration, title to the units not to be sold following termination vests in the unit owners upon termination as tenants in common in fractional interests that maintain, after taking into account the fair market value of property owned and the proceeds of property sold, their respective interests as provided in subsection (10) of this section with respect to all property appraised under said subsection (10), and liens on the units shift accordingly. While the tenancy in common exists, each unit owner and the unit owner’s successors in interest have an exclusive right to occupancy of the portion of the real estate that formerly constituted such unit.

Following termination of the common interest community, the proceeds of any sale of real estate, together with the assets of the association, are held by the association as trustee for unit owners and holders of liens on the units as their interests may appear.

Upon termination of a condominium or planned community, creditors of the association who obtain a lien and duly record it in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located are to be treated as if they had perfected liens on the units immediately before termination or when the lien is obtained and recorded, whichever is later.

In a cooperative, the declaration may provide that all creditors of the association have priority over any interests of unit owners and creditors of unit owners. In that event, upon termination, creditors of the association who obtain a lien and duly record it in every county in which any portion of the cooperative is located are to be treated as if they had perfected liens against the cooperative immediately before termination or when the lien is obtained and recorded, whichever is later. Unless the declaration provides that all creditors of the association have that priority:

The lien of each creditor of the association which was perfected against the association before termination becomes, upon termination, a lien against each unit owner’s interest in the unit as of the date the lien was perfected;

Any other creditor of the association who obtains a lien and duly records it in every county in which any portion of the cooperative is located is to be treated upon termination as if the creditor had perfected a lien against each unit owner’s interest immediately before termination or when the lien is obtained and recorded, whichever is later;

The amount of the lien of an association’s creditor described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (9) against each unit owner’s interest must be proportionate to the ratio which each unit’s common expense liability bears to the common expense liability of all of the units;

The lien of each creditor of each unit owner which was perfected before termination continues as a lien against that unit owner’s unit as of the date the lien was perfected; and

The assets of the association must be distributed to all unit owners and all lienholders as their interests may appear in the order described above. Creditors of the association are not entitled to payment from any unit owner in excess of the amount of the creditor’s lien against that unit owner’s interest.

The respective interests of unit owners referred to in subsections (5) to (9) of this section are as follows:

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (10), the respective interests of unit owners are the combined fair market values of their units, allocated interests, any limited common elements, and, in the case of a planned community, any tenant in common interest, immediately before the termination, as determined by one or more independent appraisers selected by the association. The decision of the independent appraisers shall be distributed to the unit owners and becomes final unless disapproved within thirty days after distribution by unit owners of units to which twenty-five percent of the votes in the association are allocated. The proportion of any unit owner’s interest to that of all unit owners is determined by dividing the fair market value of that unit owner’s unit and its allocated interests by the total fair market values of all the units and their allocated interests.

If any unit or any limited common element is destroyed to the extent that an appraisal of the fair market value thereof prior to destruction cannot be made, the interests of all unit owners are:

In a condominium, their respective common element interests immediately before the termination;

In a cooperative, their respective ownership interests immediately before the termination; and

In a planned community, their respective common expense liabilities immediately before the termination.

In a condominium or planned community, except as provided in subsection (12) of this section, foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against the entire common interest community does not terminate, of itself, the common interest community. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the common interest community other than withdrawable real estate does not withdraw that portion from the common interest community. Foreclosure or enforcement of a lien or encumbrance against withdrawable real estate does not withdraw, of itself, that real estate from the common interest community, but the person taking title thereto may require from the association, upon request, an amendment to the declaration excluding the real estate from the common interest community prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

In a condominium or planned community, if a lien or encumbrance against a portion of the real estate comprising the common interest community has priority over the declaration and the lien or encumbrance has not been partially released, the parties foreclosing the lien or encumbrance, upon foreclosure, may record an instrument excluding the real estate subject to that lien or encumbrance from the common interest community. The board of directors shall reallocate interests as if the foreclosed section were taken by eminent domain by an amendment to the declaration prepared, executed, and recorded by the association.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1728, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1), (5), (6), (8), IP(9), (9)(b), and (10)(a) amended, p. 649, § 15, effective April 30.

L. 2005:

(1.5) added, p. 1246, § 1, effective August 8.

38-33.3-219.
Rights of secured lenders.

The declaration may require that all or a specified number or percentage of the lenders who hold security interests encumbering the units approve specified actions of the unit owners or the association as a condition to the effectiveness of those actions, but no requirement for approval may operate to:

Deny or delegate control over the general administrative affairs of the association by the unit owners or the executive board; or

Prevent the association or the executive board from commencing, intervening in, or settling any solicitation or proceeding; or

Prevent any insurance trustee or the association from receiving and distributing any insurance proceeds pursuant to section 38-33.3-313.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1732, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-220.
Master associations.

If the declaration provides that any of the powers of a unit owners’ association described in section 38-33.3-302 are to be exercised by or may be delegated to a master association, all provisions of this article applicable to unit owners’ associations apply to any such master association except as modified by this section.

Unless it is acting in the capacity of an association described in section 38-33.3-301, a master association may exercise the powers set forth in section 38-33.3-302 (1)(b) only to the extent such powers are expressly permitted to be exercised by a master association in the declarations of common interest communities which are part of the master association or expressly described in the delegations of power from those common interest communities to the master association.

If the declaration of any common interest community provides that the executive board may delegate certain powers to a master association, the members of the executive board have no liability for the acts or omissions of the master association with respect to those powers following delegation.

The rights and responsibilities of unit owners with respect to the unit owners’ association set forth in sections 38-33.3-303, 38-33.3-308, 38-33.3-309, 38-33.3-310, and 38-33.3-312 apply in the conduct of the affairs of a master association only to persons who elect the board of a master association, whether or not those persons are otherwise unit owners within the meaning of this article.

Even if a master association is also an association described in section 38-33.3-301, the articles of incorporation and the declaration of each common interest community, the powers of which are assigned by the declaration or delegated to the master association, must provide that the executive board of the master association be elected after the period of declarant control, if any, in one of the following ways:

All unit owners of all common interest communities subject to the master association may elect all members of the master association’s executive board.

All members of the executive boards of all common interest communities subject to the master association may elect all members of the master association’s executive board.

All unit owners of each common interest community subject to the master association may elect specified members of the master association’s executive board.

All members of the executive board of each common interest community subject to the master association may elect specified members of the master association’s executive board.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1733, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 482, § 11, effective July 1.

38-33.3-221.
Merger or consolidation of common interest communities.

Any two or more common interest communities of the same form of ownership, by agreement of the unit owners as provided in subsection (2) of this section, may be merged or consolidated into a single common interest community. In the event of a merger or consolidation, unless the agreement otherwise provides, the resultant common interest community is the legal successor, for all purposes, of all of the preexisting common interest communities, and the operations and activities of all associations of the preexisting common interest communities are merged or consolidated into a single association that holds all powers, rights, obligations, assets, and liabilities of all preexisting associations.

An agreement of two or more common interest communities to merge or consolidate pursuant to subsection (1) of this section must be evidenced by an agreement prepared, executed, recorded, and certified by the president of the association of each of the preexisting common interest communities following approval by owners of units to which are allocated the percentage of votes in each common interest community required to terminate that common interest community. The agreement must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the common interest community is located and is not effective until recorded.

Every merger or consolidation agreement must provide for the reallocation of the allocated interests in the new association among the units of the resultant common interest community either by stating the reallocations or the formulas upon which they are based.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1734, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-221.5.
Withdrawal from merged common interest community.

A common interest community that was merged or consolidated with another common interest community, or is party to an agreement to do so pursuant to section 38-33.3-221, may withdraw from the merged or consolidated common interest community or terminate the agreement to merge or consolidate, without the consent of the other common interest community or communities involved, if the common interest community wishing to withdraw meets all of the following criteria:

It is a separate, platted subdivision;

Its unit owners are required to pay into two common interest communities or separate unit owners’ associations;

It is or has been a self-operating common interest community or association continuously for at least twenty-five years;

The total number of unit owners comprising it is fifteen percent or less of the total number of unit owners in the merged or consolidated common interest community or association;

Its unit owners have approved the withdrawal by a majority vote and the owners of units representing at least seventy-five percent of the allocated interests in the common interest community wishing to withdraw participated in the vote; and

Its withdrawal would not substantially impair the ability of the remainder of the merged common interest community or association to:

Enforce existing covenants;

Maintain existing facilities; or

Continue to exist.

If an association has met the requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section, it shall be considered withdrawn as of the date of the election at which its unit owners voted to withdraw.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1380, § 9, effective January 1, 2006.

38-33.3-222.
Addition of unspecified real estate.

In a common interest community, if the right is originally reserved in the declaration, the declarant, in addition to any other development right, may amend the declaration at any time during as many years as are specified in the declaration to add additional real estate to the common interest community without describing the location of that real estate in the original declaration; but the area of real estate added to the common interest community pursuant to this section may not exceed ten percent of the total area of real estate described in section 38-33.3-205 (1)(c) and (1)(h), and the declarant may not in any event increase the number of units in the common interest community beyond the number stated in the original declaration pursuant to section 38-33.3-205 (1)(d), except as provided in section 38-33.3-217 (4).

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1735, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 483, § 12, effective July 1.

38-33.3-223.
Sale of unit - disclosure to buyer. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1381, § 10, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 1225, § 14, effective May 26.